Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 2. Officers

§ 15-3-201.
Mayoral veto; overriding thereof; failure to act.

The mayor is entitled to sign or veto any ordinance passed by the governing body and to sign or veto any order, bylaw, resolution, award or vote to enter into any contract, or the allowance of any claim. A veto may be overridden by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of all the qualified members of the council. If the mayor neglects or refuses to sign any ordinance and fails to return it with his objections in writing at the next regular meeting of the governing body, it becomes law without his signature. The mayor may veto any item of any appropriation ordinance and approve the remainder thereof. The items vetoed may be passed over the veto as in other cases. The mayor does not have a vote in any matter involving the override of a veto.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 170; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-170; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 34, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to powers and duties of mayor generally, including his voting power on propositions before the governing body, see §

15-1-108

.

As to vote required for passage of an ordinance, see §

15-1-115

.

As to mayoral veto power in incorporated towns, see §

15-2-104

.

No veto power in city manager government. —

In all cities of the first class which choose to come under the manager form of government, the mayor is without the power of veto. State ex rel. Keefe v. McInerney, 63 Wyo. 280, 182 P.2d 28,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1947). See §§

15-4-201

and

15-11-105

.

§ 15-3-202.
Jurisdiction beyond corporate limits; exception.

The mayor, from time to time, shall communicate to the governing body such information and recommend such measures as in his opinion may tend to improve the finances of the city, the police, health, comfort and general prosperity of the city.

The mayor has jurisdiction as may be vested in him by ordinance:

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 104 § 2.

Except as otherwise provided by this paragraph, in all matters excepting taxation within one–half (1/2) mile of the corporate limits of the city. This paragraph shall not apply to any unincorporated area for which a county has officially adopted a comprehensive plan pursuant to W.S. 18-5-202(b). With the consent of a municipality, a comprehensive plan or a plan under W.S.

9-8-301

may delegate functions to the municipality in whole or in part and exclusively or concurrently with county performance of the functions.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 171; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-171; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2013 ch. 104, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 83, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed (b)(i) which read: “Over all places within five (5) miles of the corporate limits of the city for the enforcement of health, or quarantine ordinance and regulation thereof; and” and added the last two sentences of (b)(ii).

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, in (b), deleted “such” preceding “jurisdiction”; in (b)(ii), added “Except as otherwise provided by this paragraph” at the beginning, deleted former second and third sentences, which read: “The board of county commissioners of any county containing any area over which jurisdiction has been asserted pursuant to this paragraph may enact a resolution nullifying the ordinance as to any unincorporated area of the county subject to the ordinance.
Upon the effective date of the resolution the ordinance shall no longer be effective as to the unincorporated area of the county specified in the resolution,” and added the second and third sentences.

Within city's control. —

Landowners had standing to bring a declaratory judgment action regarding a municipal ordinance annexing certain property because, among other things, the annexation brought their land within the city's control under this section. Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

City's exercise of authority unclear. —

Duty to give notice of an annexation to landowners of adjoining property depended on whether the city exercised authority pursuant to this section, and because it was not clear that the city exercised such authority, it was possible that the landowners did not know of the annexation in question. Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Fireworks. —

Nothing in the amended §

35-10-205

or the relatively newly enacted §

35-10-208

does damage to the fundamental proposition that the sales and use of fireworks may be regulated by cities within five miles of the city limits. Ford v. City of Riverton, 919 P.2d 636,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1996).

Applied

in

Haddenham v. City of Laramie, 648 P.2d 551,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Town of Marbleton v. Town of Big Piney, 719 P.2d 1389,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 15-3-203.
President of governing body; acting president; election; duties.

The governing body may elect from their number a president who, in the absence of the mayor, shall preside at all meetings of the governing body. If the office of mayor is vacant, the president shall occupy the office until the vacancy is filled. The governing body may elect one (1) councilman to serve temporarily as acting president in the president’s absence. The president and acting president, when occupying the place of the mayor, may exercise all of the powers of that office and have the same privileges as other members of the governing body. All acts of the president or acting president, while so acting, are as binding upon the council and upon the city as if done by the mayor.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 172; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-172; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-3-204.
Appointed officers; removal; conditions for appointive office or position.

Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, the clerk, treasurer, engineer, attorney, fire chief, police chief, municipal judges and department heads as specified by ordinance shall be appointed by the mayor with the consent of the governing body and may be removed by the mayor. All other appointments, except the appointment of members of a board or commission, and removals shall be made by the mayor without consent of the governing body unless consent is required by separate statute. The governing body shall determine the method of appointing members of a board or commission, unless the method of appointing such members is specified by separate statute. The mayor has the power to remove any officer appointed under W.S.

15-1-101

through

15-10-117

for incompetency or neglect of duty.

The governing body, by ordinance or resolution, may specify conditions for any office or position to which a person is appointed under this section including:

Level or range of salary;

A description of the duties and responsibilities of the position;

Term of appointment;

Requirements for:

Promotions;

Suspension; and

Hearing of appeals from decisions of the mayor to remove or discharge an appointee other than members of a board or commission, after which the governing body may affirm, modify or reverse the decision of the mayor; and

Other matters which are part of the personnel policies of the city.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 173; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-173; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 34, § 2; 1985, ch. 42, § 1; 1997, ch. 68, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision that mayor shall have the superintending control of all officers of the city, see §

15-1-108

.

Mayor authorized to summarily discharge police chief. —

The mayor of Newcastle had the authority under the law to discharge the chief of police without council approval and without a hearing. Carlson v. Bratton, 681 P.2d 1333,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1984).

Employment provision of §

15-1-103

applicable to “at-will” employee. —

Section 15-1-103(a)(xxxvii), relating to positions necessary for the efficient operation of the city or town, was applicable to a municipal garbage man under an “at-will,” as opposed to a fixed-term, contract. Siebken v. Wheatland, 700 P.2d 1236,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 490

(Wyo. 1985).

In determining whether discharged police chief was given fair hearing,

where statute does not provide for notice and hearing, presence or absence of arbitrariness is the ultimate criterion. Cowan v. State, 57 Wyo. 309, 116 P.2d 854,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1941).

Admission by ousted officer that he was incompetent to perform duties of his office should be taken into consideration in determining whether he was given fair hearing. Cowan v. State, 57 Wyo. 309, 116 P.2d 854,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1941).

Oral notice and hearing were not improper

where police chief was given fair hearing or hearings, however informal, and opportunity to defend himself. Cowan v. State, 57 Wyo. 309, 116 P.2d 854,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 15-3-205.
Salaries; minimum amounts.

The salaries of all officers shall be fixed by ordinance but the salaries of the following officers shall not be less than the following amounts per year:

Mayor, six hundred dollars ($600.00);

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 8, § 2.

Each councilman, ten dollars ($10.00) for actual attendance at each regular or special meeting of the governing body or any committee meeting.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 8, § 2.

All other officers of the city shall receive the compensation fixed by ordinance except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 175; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-175; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 8, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to change of emoluments of officers during term, see §

15-3-213

.

For constitutional provisions that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of such officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

§ 15-3-206.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 209, § 1.

Cross references. —

For present provision on prohibitions, see §

15-1-127

.

§ 15-3-207.
Elected officers; qualifications; bonds.

All elected officers shall be qualified electors of the city entitled to vote at all elections therein. Each officer shall give bond in an amount and upon conditions as are provided by ordinance.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 177; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-177; Laws 1977, ch. 9, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-3-208.
Treasurer; failure to provide required reports; removal; vacancy.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

If the treasurer neglects or fails to provide financial reports as required by the governing body, the mayor may declare the office vacant and fill the vacancy by appointment according to W.S.

15-3-204

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 178; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-178; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 49, § 2; 1985, ch. 152, §§ 2, 4.

Cross references. —

As to employee bonds, see §

15-1-124

.

As to appointment of treasurer in cities of the first class, see §

15-3-204

.

As to salary of treasurer, see §

15-3-205

.

As to publication of financial statements, see §

15-3-306

.

As to treasurer in cities operating under the commission form of government, see §

15-4-104

.

As to treasurer in cities operating under the city manager form of government, see §

15-4-202

.

As to state treasurer, see §

9-1-409

.

As to county treasurer, see §

18-3-801

et seq.

§ 15-3-209.
Treasurer; receiving monies; books and accounts.

The city treasurer shall receive all monies belonging to the city. The clerk and treasurer shall keep their books and accounts in the manner prescribed by W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-124

. The books and accounts may be inspected at any time by the mayor, councilmen and other persons designated by law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 179; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-179; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 49, § 2; 1985, ch. 152, § 2.

§ 15-3-210.
Treasurer; handling monies; restrictions; removal; vacancy.

The treasurer shall not, either directly or indirectly, use the corporation money or warrants in his custody for his own use and benefit or that of any other person. If anyone violates this provision, the mayor may remove him from office immediately and declare the office vacant. If an office is declared vacant, the mayor shall fill the vacancy by appointment according to W.S.

15-3-204

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 180; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-180; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 152, § 2.

§ 15-3-211.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 181, related to the treasurer's annual report and registration of warrant. For present provisions as to annual report, see §

15-3-208

.

§ 15-3-212.
Engineer; duties; other employees; outside work.

The city engineer shall keep records of all work done for the city and any other records the governing body requires. All such records are public records belonging to the city and shall be turned over to any successor to the office. The city may employ other engineers or assistants for any work for the city either within or without the city limits. Any work done by the city engineer for the city, outside the limits thereof, shall be expressly provided by ordinance.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 182; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-182; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2015 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Before the governing body makes any contract for any work or improvement exceeding two hundred dollars ($200.00), the city engineer shall submit to the governing body an estimate of the cost thereof.”

Cross references. —

As to appointment of engineer, see §

15-3-204

.

As to state engineer, see §§

9-1-901

through

9-1-909

.

As to county surveyors, see §§

18-3-701

through

18-3-705

.

For provisions relative to surveyors and engineers generally, see §§ 33-29-114 through 33-29-139.

Land surveyor accepting office of city engineer

is guilty of no crime unless he practices, or offers to practice, professional engineering. State v. Butler, 40 Wyo. 404, 278 P. 563,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1929).

§ 15-3-213.
Change of emoluments during term prohibited.

The emoluments of any elective officer shall not be increased or diminished during the term for which he was elected. No person who has resigned or vacated any office is eligible to the same office during the time for which he was elected or appointed, if during the same time the emoluments have been increased.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 183; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-183; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to salaries of officers, see §

15-3-205

.

For constitutional provision that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of such officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.